Oklahoma, session 2026, SB68.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 62 O.S. 2021, Section 35.3, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 35.3. As used in the Information Technology
Consolidation and Coordination Act:
1. “Appropriated state agency” means any state agency that
receives funding through the annual legislative appropriations
process;
2. “Information technology assets” means any equipment or
interconnected system or subsystem of equipment that is used in the
acquisition, storage, manipulation, management, movement, control,
display, switching, interchange, transmission, or reception of data
or information. The term shall include computers, ancillary
equipment, software, firmware and similar procedures, services,
including support services and consulting services, software
development, and related resources, and shall further include
telecommunications fiber networks used for conveying electronic
communication or information systems to multiple physical locations;

3. “Information technology position” means a classified or
unclassified position in the following functional areas:
a. applications programming,
b. EDP audit,
c. data examination,
d. computer applications,
e. computer data entry,
f. computer networking,
g. computer operations,
h. computer programming,
i. computer security,
j. computer software design,
k. web applications,
l. database analysis,
m. data management analysis,
n. database development,
o. database programming,
p. software design/development,
q. help desk,
r. imaging,
s. systems analysis,
ENR. S. B. NO. 68 Page 2

t. systems application planning,
u. systems application,
v. systems administration,
w. systems coordination,
x. systems integration,
y. systems operation,
z. systems planning/development,
aa. systems programming,
bb. systems engineering,
cc. systems service specialist,
dd. systems support,
ee. network administration,
ff. network management,
gg. network technical,
hh. operating systems specialist,
ii. systems program manager,
jj. telecommunications, whether data or voice,
kk. software training, and
ll. technology development or support;
4. “Nonappropriated state agency” means any state agency that
does not receive funding through the annual legislative
appropriations process;
ENR. S. B. NO. 68 Page 3

5. “Shared services” means those state agency functions which
are or could be provided through:
a. the services and systems specified in subsection A of
Section 35.6 of this title, and
b. the programs, services, software, or processes
specified in subsection B of Section 35.6 of this
title; and
6. “State agency” means any office, elected or appointed
officer, bureau, board, commission, counsel, unit, division, body,
authority, or institution of the executive branch of state
government excluding institutions within The Oklahoma State System
of Higher Education, the Oklahoma Municipal Power Authority, the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education, the Oklahoma State
Bureau of Investigation, the District Attorneys Council, the Office
of the Attorney General, the Office of the State Auditor and
Inspector, and the telecommunications network known as OneNet.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 35.7a of Title 62, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Except as otherwise provided by the Information Technology
Consolidation and Coordination Act, any state agency may employ
information technology personnel to develop and implement the
agency’s technology strategy, provided that the agency remains
subject to the standards, policies, and oversight established by the
Chief Information Officer of this state for the purposes of data
integrity and security.
B. A state agency may employ information technology personnel
pursuant to this section if it first enters into a memorandum of
understanding with the Chief Information Officer detailing, at a
minimum:
1. The specific positions and job descriptions that the agency
plans to hire;
2. The qualifications of the positions;
ENR. S. B. NO. 68 Page 4

3. Agreement by the state agency to be bound by the standards,
policies, and oversight set forth by the Chief Information Officer
for security and data integrity purposes; and
4. Any other terms deemed necessary by the Chief Information
Officer or the state agency.
No information technology personnel shall be hired or retained
by the state agency until a memorandum of understanding has been
fully executed by both the Chief Information Officer and the state
agency.
C. The Chief Information Officer, at his or her discretion, may
audit the state agency’s compliance with the provisions of the
memorandum of understanding and any other requirements of this
section.
D. The authorization described in this section shall not be
construed as a waiver or exemption of any other provisions of the
Information Technology Consolidation and Coordination Act.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 68 Page 5

Passed the Senate the 15th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 5th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 68 Page 6